Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-191
Webster.

The county of Webster is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township one, north, of range twelve, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township one, north, of range nine, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township four, north, of range nine, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township four, north, of range twelve, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 55, p. 222;

R.S.1913, § 906;

C.S.1922, § 808;

C.S.1929, § 25-195;

R.S.1943, § 22-191.